Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201821-2,163
Share exchange.

(MBCA 11.03) (a) Through a share exchange:

(1) A domestic corporation
may acquire all of the shares of one or more classes or series of shares of
another domestic or foreign corporation, or all of the interests of one or
more classes or series of interests of a domestic or foreign other entity,
in exchange for shares or other securities, interests, obligations, rights
to acquire shares or other securities, cash, other property, or any combination
of the foregoing pursuant to a plan of share exchange; or

(2) All of the shares of
one or more classes or series of shares of a domestic corporation may be acquired
by another domestic or foreign corporation or other entity in exchange for
shares or other securities, interests, obligations, rights to acquire shares
or other securities, cash, other property, or any combination of the foregoing
pursuant to a plan of share exchange.

(b) A foreign corporation or eligible entity may be
a party to a share exchange only if the share exchange is permitted by the
organic law of the corporation or other entity.

(c) If the organic law of a domestic
other entity does not provide procedures for the approval of a share exchange,
a plan of share exchange may be adopted and approved and the share exchange
effectuated in accordance with the procedures, if any, for a merger. If the
organic law of a domestic other entity does not provide procedures for the
approval of either a share exchange or a merger, a plan of share exchange
may be adopted and approved, the share exchange effectuated, and appraisal
rights exercised, in accordance with the procedures in sections 21-2,161 to
21-2,168 and 21-2,171 to 21-2,183. For the purposes of applying sections 21-2,161
to 21-2,168 and 21-2,171 to 21-2,183:

(1) The other entity, its interest holders, interests,
and organic documents taken together shall be deemed to be a domestic business
corporation, shareholders, shares, and articles of incorporation, respectively
and vice versa as the context may require; and

(2) If the business and affairs of the
other entity are managed by a group of persons that is not identical to the
interest holders, that group shall be deemed to be the board of directors.

(d) The plan of share exchange
must include:

(1)
The name of each corporation or other entity whose shares or interests will
be acquired and the name of the corporation or other entity that will acquire
those shares or interests;

(2)
The terms and conditions of the share exchange;

(3) The manner and basis of exchanging
shares of a corporation or interests in an other entity whose shares or interests
will be acquired under the share exchange into shares or other securities,
interests, obligations, rights to acquire shares, other securities, or interests,
cash, other property, or any combination of the foregoing; and

(4) Any other provisions
required by the laws under which any party to the share exchange is organized
or by the articles of incorporation or organic document of any such party.

(e) Terms of a plan of share
exchange may be made dependent on facts objectively ascertainable outside
the plan in accordance with subsection (k) of section 21-203.

(f) The plan of share exchange
may also include a provision that the plan may be amended prior to filing
articles of share exchange, but if the shareholders of a domestic corporation
that is a party to the share exchange are required or permitted to vote on
the plan, the plan must provide that subsequent to approval of the plan by
such shareholders the plan may not be amended to change:

(1) The amount or kind of
shares or other securities, interests, obligations, rights to acquire shares,
other securities, or interests, cash, or other property to be issued by the
corporation or to be received under the plan by the shareholders of or owners
of interests in any party to the share exchange; or

(2) Any of the other terms or conditions
of the plan if the change would adversely affect such shareholders in any
material respect.

(g)
This section does not limit the power of a domestic corporation to acquire
shares of another corporation or interests in another entity in a transaction
other than a share exchange.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 163.